Maryland, session 2026, HB0887.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1A–31.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (8) of this subsection, the local impact
grants provided under § 9–1A–27 of this subtitle shall be distributed as provided in this
subsection.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0887*

HOUSE BILL 887
(8) (I) Beginning after a video lottery operation license is issued to a
video lottery facility in Baltimore City, 100% of the local impact grants provided under §
9–1A–27 of this subtitle from the proceeds of the video lottery facilities located in Allegany,
Cecil, and Worcester counties shall be distributed to the local jurisdictions in which those
video lottery facilities are located.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION,
FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, OF THE AMOUNT DISTRIBUTED
TO CECIL COUNTY, $200,000 SHALL BE USED FOR PURSES OFFERED FOR RACES
HELD AT THE FAIR HILL NATURAL RESOURCES MANAGEMENT AREA IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION
ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.